Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2901
Manufactured home or mobile home; deemed real property.

For purposes of a bankruptcy plan under 11 U.S.C. chapter 13, a manufactured home or a mobile home shall be deemed real property under subdivision (b)(2) of 11 U.S.C. 1322, as such section existed on July 18, 2008.

Laws 2008, LB953, § 1.